Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.060

City manager may serve two or more cities.

Whether the city manager shall devote his or her full time to the affairs of one code city shall be determined by the council. A city manager may serve two or more cities in that capacity at the same time.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3023; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.060.]